Washington statutes.
RCW 43.84.180

Public works assistance account earnings—Share to public facilities construction loan revolving account.

The proportionate share of earnings based on the average daily balance in the public works assistance account shall be placed in the public facilities construction loan revolving fund, provided that during the 2015-2017 biennium the public works assistance account must retain its own interest earnings and costs.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 35 s 6021; 2003 c 150 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 35: See note following RCW 28B.10.027.

Effective date—2003 c 150 ss 2 and 3: See note following RCW 43.84.092.

Findings—Intent—2003 c 150; 2002 c 242: See note following RCW 43.84.092.